Utah statutes.
11-42-407.   Improvements that change the grade of an existing street, alley, or sidewalk -- Improvements that improve an intersection or spaces opposite an alley.

(1)  If an improvement in an assessment area involves changing the grade of an existing street, alley, or sidewalk, the local entity shall pay half of the cost of bringing the street, alley, or sidewalk to the established grade.

(2)  If an improvement in an assessment area improves an intersection of streets or spaces opposite an alley, the local entity may levy an assessment against the other properties to be assessed in the assessment area for the cost of the improvement.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

